Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.28, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Disparate impact cases in employment. If the complaining party has met its burden of showing that deleted text begin an employmentdeleted text end new text begin the respondent'snew text end practice is responsible for a statistically significant adverse impact on a particular class of persons protected by deleted text begin section 363A.08, subdivision 2, an employerdeleted text end new text begin sections 363A.08 to 363A.19, a respondentnew text end must justify that practice by demonstrating that the practice deleted text begin is manifestly related to the job ordeleted text end significantly furthers an important businessnew text begin , governmental, or educationalnew text end purpose. new text begin For purposes of section 363A.08, subdivision 2, a respondent must also demonstrate that the challenged practice is manifestly related to the job for the position in question. new text end Upon establishment of this justification, the charging party may prevail upon demonstration of the existence of a comparably effective practice that the court finds would cause a significantly lesser adverse impact on the identified protected class.